Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202630-2636
Procedure concerning hearing and order on original petition.

(a) Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order because of minority, the court shall set a date for hearing on the matters alleged in the petition. If, at any time in the proceeding, the court determines that the interests of the minor are or may be inadequately represented, the court may appoint an attorney to represent the minor, giving consideration to the choice of the minor if he or she is fourteen years of age or older. A lawyer appointed by the court to represent a minor as provided in sections 30-4201 to 30-4210 has the powers and duties of a guardian ad litem.

(b) Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order for reasons other than minority, the court shall set a date for hearing. Unless the person to be protected has counsel of his or her own choice, the court may appoint an attorney to represent him or her in the proceeding. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem as provided in sections 30-4201 to 30-4210 to advocate for the best interests of the person to be protected. If the alleged disability is mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness or disability, chronic use of drugs, or chronic intoxication, the court may direct that the person to be protected be examined by a physician designated by the court, preferably a physician who is not connected with any institution in which the person is a patient or is detained. The court may send a visitor to interview the person to be protected. The visitor may be a guardian ad litem or an officer or employee of the court.

(c) The minor or person to be protected under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall have the right to attend each court hearing virtually or in person.

(d) After hearing, upon finding that clear and convincing evidence exists for the appointment of a conservator or other protective order, the court shall make an appointment or other appropriate protective order.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 254, UPC § 5-407;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 16;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 27;

Laws 2026, LB985, § 5.
July 18, 2026